District of Columbia statutes.
10-404

Repealed

Authorization to obtain records, notification of criminal background check and traffic record check.

Repealed.

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-123, § 5, 47 DCR 2050
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 251, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 251 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).